test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_lakke_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - lakke: # ok LAKKE
    lakke+N+Sg+Nom:  lakke
    lakke+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊhe
    lakke+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊhe
    lakke+N+Sg+Ill:  laakan
    lakke+N+Sg+Loc:  lahheest
    lakke+N+Sg+Com:  lohhijn
    lakke+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊhettáá
    lakke+N+Ess:  lakken
    lakke+N+Par:  lakked
    lakke+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊheh
    lakke+N+Pl+Gen:  [loohij, loˊhij]
    lakke+N+Pl+Acc:  loohijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Ill:  lohhijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Loc:  loohijn
    lakke+N+Pl+Com:  loˊhijguin
    lakke+N+Pl+Abe:  loˊhijttáá

  Noun - lokke: # ok LAKKE
    lokke+N+Sg+Nom:  lokke
    lokke+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊhe
    lokke+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊhe
    lokke+N+Sg+Ill:  lookán
    lokke+N+Sg+Loc:  lohheest
    lokke+N+Sg+Com:  luhhijn
    lokke+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊhettáá
    lokke+N+Ess:  lokken
    lokke+N+Par:  lokked
    lokke+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊheh
    lokke+N+Pl+Gen: [luuhij, luˊhij]
    lokke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuhijn
    lokke+N+Pl+Com:  luˊhijguin
    lokke+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊhijttáá

  Noun - rokke: # ok LAKKE
    rokke+N+Sg+Nom:  rokke
    rokke+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊhe
    rokke+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊhe
    rokke+N+Sg+Ill:  rookán
    rokke+N+Sg+Loc:  rohheest
    rokke+N+Sg+Com:  ruhhijn
    rokke+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊhettáá
    rokke+N+Ess:  rokken
    rokke+N+Par:  rokked
    rokke+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊheh
    rokke+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuhij, ruˊhij]
    rokke+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Ill:  ruhhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuhijn
    rokke+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊhijguin
    rokke+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊhijttáá

  Noun - čukke: # ok LAKKE
    čukke+N+Sg+Nom:  čukke
    čukke+N+Sg+Gen:  čuˊhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Acc:  čuˊhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Ill:  čuukán
    čukke+N+Sg+Loc:  čuhheest
    čukke+N+Sg+Com:  čuhhijn
    čukke+N+Sg+Abe:  čuˊhettáá
    čukke+N+Ess:  čukken
    čukke+N+Par:  čukked
    čukke+N+Pl+Nom:  čuˊheh
    čukke+N+Pl+Gen: [čuuhij, čuˊhij]
    čukke+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Ill:  čuhhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuhijn
    čukke+N+Pl+Com:  čuˊhijguin
    čukke+N+Pl+Abe:  čuˊhijttáá

  Noun - mokke: # ok LAKKE
    mokke+N+Sg+Nom:  mokke
    mokke+N+Sg+Gen:  moˊhe
    mokke+N+Sg+Acc:  moˊhe
    mokke+N+Sg+Ill:  mookán
    mokke+N+Sg+Loc:  mohheest
    mokke+N+Sg+Com:  muhhijn
    mokke+N+Sg+Abe:  moˊhettáá
    mokke+N+Ess:  mokken
    mokke+N+Par:  mokked
    mokke+N+Pl+Nom:  moˊheh
    mokke+N+Pl+Gen: [muuhij, muˊhij]
    mokke+N+Pl+Acc:  muuhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Ill:  muhhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Loc:  muuhijn
    mokke+N+Pl+Com:  muˊhijguin
    mokke+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊhijttáá

  Noun - tikke: # ok LAKKE
    tikke+N+Sg+Nom:  tikke
    tikke+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊhe
    tikke+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊhe
    tikke+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikke+N+Sg+Loc:  tihheest
    tikke+N+Sg+Com:  tihhijn
    tikke+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊhettáá
    tikke+N+Ess:  tikken
    tikke+N+Par:  tikked
    tikke+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊheh
    tikke+N+Pl+Gen: [tiihij, tiˊhij]
    tikke+N+Pl+Acc:  tiihijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Ill:  tihhijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Loc:  tiihijn
    tikke+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊhijguin
    tikke+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊhijttáá


  Noun - kukse: # ok LAKKE
    kukse+N+Sg+Nom:  kukse
    kukse+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Ill:  kuuksán
    kukse+N+Sg+Loc:  kuvseest
    kukse+N+Sg+Com:  kuvssijn
    kukse+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊvsettáá
    kukse+N+Ess:  kuksen
    kukse+N+Par:  kuksed
    kukse+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊvseh
    kukse+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvsij, kuˊvsij]
    kukse+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvsijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Ill:  kuvssijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvsijn
    kukse+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvsijguin
    kukse+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvsijttáá
